Maine, session 132, LD169.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Maine as follows:
Sec. 1. 22 MRSA §14, sub-§2-I, ¶H is enacted to read:
H. Beginning January 1, 2026, the amount of the claim collected under this subsection
is adjusted by subtracting the cost of collecting the claim and the amount attributable
to federal payments to the State made according to the Federal Medical Assistance
Percentage. The remainder must be refunded to the estate of the deceased recipient.
Sec. 2. Asset transfer for eligibility; standard of proof; amend rules. The
Department of Health and Human Services shall amend its rules in Chapter 332: MaineCare
Eligibility Manual, Part 15, Transfer of Assets, in Section 1.6 to remove the standard of
"clear and convincing evidence" required to prove that a transfer of an asset was not
intended at the time of transfer to result in eligibility for Medicaid and replace it with a
"preponderance of evidence" standard. The preponderance of evidence standard must
apply to all asset transfers, including payments to a person who is a family member or
guardian for the provision of services in assisting with activities of daily living or
instrumental activities of daily living that prevented the applicant's transfer to residential
or nursing facility care. The department shall adopt rules to implement this section no later
than January 1, 2026. Rules adopted pursuant to this section are major substantive rules as
defined in the Maine Revised Statutes, Title 5, chapter 375, subchapter 2-A.
Sec. 3. Public information regarding estate recovery in MaineCare
program. After consultation with interested parties and advocates and before January 1,
2026, the Department of Health and Human Services shall prepare and publish
informational documents, including brochures and postings on the department's publicly
accessible website, educating the public about estate recovery requirements under the
Maine Revised Statutes, Title 22, section 14. The publications must include information
about long-term care planning and transferring and sheltering of assets as allowed under
any federal and state law, regulations and rules. The department shall ensure that the
information is broadly distributed to MaineCare members, area agencies on aging and other
relevant organizations.
Sec. 4. Public information regarding home and community-based services
provided by family member or guardian. After consultation with interested parties
and advocates and before January 1, 2026, the Department of Health and Human Services
shall prepare and distribute a brochure written in clear and easily understandable language
describing the circumstances, requirements and eligibility to allow family members or legal
guardians to be reimbursed for providing personal care services to a family member who
is eligible to receive home and community-based services under the MaineCare program
or a state-funded program. The brochure must include, at a minimum, the following:
1. Information on which programs allow for family members or guardians to be
reimbursed for providing services;
2. Information on how and where the family member can apply and how to register as
a personal care agency, if required. It must also include information for the person eligible
to receive home and community-based services on how and where to apply and must
include information on self-direction services, as applicable; and
Page 1 - 132LR0275(01)

3. Any relevant information on consequences with respect to the estate recovery
program of the Maine Revised Statutes, Title 22, section 14 of a family member being
reimbursed for providing personal care services if it becomes necessary for the family
member receiving services to enter a long-term care facility.
The brochure must be available to any new applicants applying for home and
community-based services provided under the MaineCare program or a state-funded
program. The department shall also make the brochure available to the general public and
to the area agencies on aging and post it on the department's publicly accessible website.